Massachusetts, session 194th, H1045.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5C of said chapter 21E, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
adding the following subsection:-
(l) A department audit of response actions at the site or portion of the site owned
or operated by an eligible person, as delineated in a waste site cleanup activity opinion, for which
a permanent solution or remedy operations status exists and is maintained or has been achieved
and maintained in accordance with such opinion, which (i) identifies no violations of this chapter
and regulations promulgated thereto, or (ii) if such violations are identified, such violations are
promptly corrected, shall be deemed conclusive evidence that the eligible person has no liability,
and the department may take no action as to such eligible person, for any releases at any property
not previously identified as part of the site or any other disposal site. Notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, the department shall not promulgate regulations relative to
this subsection.
of 2

SECTION 2. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, no
person shall be liable for any substantial release migration at any property not previously
identified as part of a disposal site or any other disposal site if the department of environmental
protection:
(i) has, at any time before the effective date of this act, performed an audit of
response actions at a site, or a part of a site; and
(ii)(1) has determined that a permanent solution or remedy operations status was
achieved and maintained in accordance with a waste site cleanup activity opinion or any other
notification to such person; or (2) has notified such person that a violation of chapter 21E of the
General Laws or any regulation was identified and promptly corrected.
(b) The department of environmental protection shall have no defense in any
action or claim, nor shall the department present evidence to contest liability of an eligible
person, upon a showing that a permanent solution or remedy operations status was achieved and
maintained.
of 2